California statutes. Insurance Code
(11) The following statement: “As a public adjuster, I am required by the California Insurance Code to post a surety bond in the sum of $20,000 to cover certain kinds of claims made by you, the insured. If you have any questions concerning the surety bond, you may contact the California Department of Insurance Licensing Hotline at 1-800-967-9331 or www.insurance.ca.gov.”

(12) A statement of the compensation to the licensee, including the percentage and
 base to which the percentage applies.

(13) A statement that the insured has the right to cancel the contract within three business days of signing it and being provided the signed contract.

(c) A contract covered by this section shall not contain a contract term that does any of the following:

(1) Allows the licensee’s fee to be collected when money is due from an insurer, but not paid, or allows a licensee to collect the entire fee from the first payment issued by an insurer, rather than as a percentage of each payment issued by an insurer.

(2) Requires the insured to authorize an insurer to issue a payment only in the name of the licensee.

(3) Imposes late fees or collection costs on the
 insured.

(d) A licensee shall not solicit or attempt to solicit a client for employment during a loss-producing occurrence. A loss-producing occurrence continues to exist when any of the following conditions exist at the property that is subject to solicitation:

(1) Any of the circumstances that caused the loss are present at the property where the solicitation would otherwise take place.

(2) Emergency responders are present at the property where the solicitation would otherwise take place.

(3) An evacuation order is still in effect at the property where the solicitation would otherwise take place.

(e) A licensee or any other person or entity offering, for a fee, service regulated by this
 chapter shall not solicit a policyholder for employment or initiate any contact with a policyholder between the hours of 6 p.m. and 8 a.m., unless requested by the policyholder.

(f) A licensee shall not use any form of contract other than that approved by the commissioner and that contains each of the following:

(1) A provision allowing the client to cancel the contract by written notice sent or delivered by certified mail, return receipt requested, or other form of mailing that provides proof of mailing, to the licensee by midnight of the third business day after the day on which the client signs a contract that complies with this section and is provided a copy of that signed contract. Each copy of the contract shall contain a completed form, captioned “Notice of Cancellation,” that shall be placed at the end of the contract and be separated from the remainder of the contract by
 a printed line. Nothing shall be printed on the reverse side of the notice form. The notice form shall be completed by the licensee, and shall contain in type of at least 10-point the following statement written in the same language, e.g., Spanish, as used in the contract:

Notice of Cancellation(Date of Contract)You may cancel this contract within three business days from the above date that you signed the contract and you were provided with a copy of that signed contract, except that, as it pertains to a disaster as defined in Section 15001, your right to cancel is five calendar days without any penalty or obligation to pay your public adjuster, other
 than for reimbursement of moneys paid by your public adjuster for out-of-pocket emergency expenses for you or on your behalf. If your public adjuster seeks reimbursement from you for out-of-pocket emergency expenses, your public adjuster shall provide you with an itemized statement of those emergency expenses advanced to you or on your behalf if the cancellation is made within the first three business days after the contract was signed by you and you were provided a copy of the signed contract. Nothing in this contract permits your public adjuster to recover any costs, except for out-of-pocket emergency expenses advanced to you.

If you cancel, any money or other consideration paid by you will be returned within five business days following the receipt of your cancellation notice, and any security interest arising out of the transaction will be canceled.

To cancel this contract, mail or deliver by certified mail, return
 receipt requested, or other form of mailing that provides proof of mailing, a signed and dated copy of this cancellation notice, or any other written notice, or send a telegram to:(name of public adjuster)at
(address of public adjuster’s place of business)
not later than midnight of(Date)I hereby cancel this contract(Date)(Client’s signature)(2) The statement “WE REPRESENT THE INSURED ONLY” prominently displayed in at least 10-point type.

(3) A provision disclosing the percentage of the insured’s claim, or other fee, that the licensee will charge for his or her services. The licensee shall obtain the initials of the insured next to this provision.

(4) A conspicuous statement in at least 10-point type in immediate proximity to the space reserved for the client’s signature, as follows: “You may cancel this contract at any time
 before midnight of the third business day after the date of this contract. See the notice of cancellation form at the end of this contract for an explanation of this right.”

(g) A licensee shall not knowingly make any false report to his or her employer or divulge to any other person, except as he or she may be required by law to do so, any information acquired by him or her except at the direction of the employer or a client for whom the information is obtained.

(h) A licensee shall not use a badge in connection with the official activities of the licensee’s business.

(i) A licensee shall not permit an employee or agent in his or her own name to advertise, engage clients, furnish reports, or present bills to clients, or in any manner whatever to conduct business for which a license is required under this
 chapter.

(j) Pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 15006, the commissioner shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter and prosecute violations thereunder committed by unlicensed persons or entities that hold themselves out or act as public insurance adjusters.

(k) For purposes of this section, “business day” shall have the same meaning given to that term in subdivision (e) of Section 1689.5 of the Civil Code, as in effect on the operative date of this statute.

(l) The contract and the notice of cancellation set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) shall be written in the same language, e.g., Spanish, as principally used in the negotiation of the contract.

(m) Within five business days after a contract has been
 canceled, the licensee shall tender to the client any payments made by the client and any note or other evidence of indebtedness, including an itemized statement of all amounts tendered to the client.

(n) The licensee is not entitled to compensation for services performed prior to cancellation, other than for reimbursement of moneys paid by the licensee for out-of-pocket emergency expenses for the client or on behalf of the client. If the licensee seeks reimbursement from the client for out-of-pocket emergency expenses, and if the cancellation is made within the first three business days after the contract was initiated, the licensee shall provide the client with an itemized statement of those emergency expenses advanced to the client or on behalf of the client by the licensee. Nothing in this subdivision shall permit the licensee to recover any costs, except for out-of-pocket emergency expenses advanced to the client. Any security interest
 shall be canceled upon cancellation of the contract.

(o) Notice of cancellation given by the client need not take the particular form specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). Notice of cancellation, however expressed, is effective if it indicates the intention of the client not to be bound by the contract.

(p) Cancellation occurs when the client gives written notice of cancellation by certified mail, return receipt requested, or other form of mailing that provides proof of mailing, to the licensee at the address specified in the contract.

(q) Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, is effective when sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or other form of mailing that provides proof of mailing, properly addressed with postage prepaid.

(r) Until the licensee has complied with this section, the client may cancel the contract.

(s) The contracts shall be executed in duplicate. The licensee shall retain one original contract, and shall provide the insured with an original contract.

(t) The licensee shall provide the client with an original contract and notice of cancellation at the time the client signs the contract.

(u) Any confession of judgment or waiver of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

(v) Prior to the signing of the contract, the licensee shall provide the insured with a separate printed disclosure document in the following form that bears the name and license number of the licensee:

“DISCLOSURE

There are three types of insurance adjusters that could be involved in the processing of your insurance claim. The definitions of the three types are as follows:

(1) Public adjusters means the insurance adjusters who do not work for your insurance company. They work for you, the insured, to assist in the preparation, presentation, and settlement of your claim. You hire them by signing a contract and agreeing to pay them a fee or commission based on a percentage of the settlement, or other method of compensation. Public adjusters are required to be licensed, bonded, and tested by the State of California to represent your interest only.

(2) Company adjusters means the insurance adjusters who are employees of your insurance company. They represent your insurance company and are
 paid by your insurance company. They will not charge you a fee and are not individually licensed or tested by the State of California.

(3) Independent adjusters means the insurance adjusters who are hired on a contract basis by your insurance company to represent the company in the settlement of the claim. They are paid by your insurance company. They will not charge you a fee.

You have the right, but are not required, to use the services of a public adjuster in the preparation and handling of your insurance claim.

Public adjusters cannot solicit your business while the loss is underway, or between the hours of 6 p.m. and 8 a.m.

Your “Public Adjuster Contract,” with a public adjuster representing you, should clearly indicate the amount of the fee you will be paying to your public adjuster. Your contract, with this fee
 percentage, should be acknowledged by your initials on the “Public Adjuster Contract.” The salary, fee, commission, or other consideration is to be paid by you (the insured), not the insurance company (insurer).

You have the right to cancel the contract with your public adjuster, without any penalty or obligation, within three business days from the date the contract is signed. If the contract was established from a catastrophic disaster as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 15001, the insured has the right to cancel within five calendar days.

If you cancel the contract with your public adjuster, any money or other consideration paid by you will be returned within five business days following the receipt of your cancellation notice, and any security interest arising out of the transaction will be canceled.

To cancel the contract with your public adjuster, mail or deliver by
 certified mail, return receipt requested, or other form of mailing that provides proof of mailing, a signed and dated copy of the cancellation notice, or any other written notice, or send a telegram to the public adjuster at the address in the contract.

You have the right to, and may, communicate with your insurance company at any time if you feel the need during the claims process.

If you have any concerns or questions, the officers at the California Department of Insurance Consumer Hotline are there to help you. Please contact them at 1-800-927-HELP (4357) or www.insurance.ca.gov.”

(w) No later than three business days after the cancellation has expired, the public adjuster shall notify the insurer, its adjuster, or its attorney, that he or she has entered into a written contract with the insured.

(x) If the licensee misrepresents or conceals a material fact from the insured prior to execution of the contract, the insured is entitled to rescind the contract without time limit.

(y) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if a property loss is included in an area that is subject to a catastrophic disaster, as defined in Section 15001, the insured shall have the right to cancel a contract with a public adjuster within five calendar days of signing it and being provided a copy of the signed contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 15.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15027.1.

(a) In addition to the restrictions in subdivision (e) of Section 15027, a licensee shall not solicit a contract of engagement for residential properties under this chapter that are included in an area subject to a catastrophic disaster until seven calendar days have elapsed from the conclusion of a loss-producing occurrence as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 15027.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply if the licensee is contacted directly by the insured or the insured’s representative.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) shall prohibit a licensee from providing a policyholder, without making personal contact with the policyholder, with accurate written
 materials explaining services provided by public insurance adjusters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 16.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15027.5.

Any person acting as a public adjuster who has executed a contract as described in Section 15027 is the agent of the insured. While acting under the authority of such a contract, a public adjuster may not receive any fees or other consideration, monetary or otherwise, from either the insured or any other source, in excess of the amount or percentage provided in the contract. Any compensation received by the public adjuster from any party or any other source connected to the claim adjustment, including any contractor, insurer, or vendor, shall be disclosed by the public adjuster to the insured. The insured may rescind the contract if the adjuster fails to make the required disclosure or if the public adjuster’s receipt of any compensation from a third party conflicts with the interests of the insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

15028.

No person licensed as a public insurance adjuster shall do any of the following:

(a) Use any misrepresentation to solicit a contract or agreement to adjust a claim.

(b) Solicit or accept remuneration from, or have a financial interest in, any salvage, repair or other firm which obtains business in connection with any claim he or she has a contract or agreement to adjust.

(c) Advance moneys to any potential client or insured in order to obtain business.

(d) Offer to pay a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, exceeding one hundred dollars
 ($100), to a person for referring a loss unless he or she employs that person to so act for him or her and that person is licensed to act as an adjuster under the provisions of this chapter.

(e) Permit an employee or agent, in his or her own name, to advertise, engage clients, furnish reports, present bills to clients, or in any manner conduct business for which a license is required pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 17.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15028.5.

(a) A public insurance adjuster shall maintain a complete record of each of his or her transactions as a public insurance adjuster. The records shall include all of the following:

(1) The name of the insured.

(2) The date, location, and amount of the loss.

(3) A copy of the contract between the public insurance adjuster and the insured.

(4) The name of the insurer and the amount, expiration date, and number of each policy carried with respect to the loss.

(5) An itemized statement of the recoveries by the insured from the sources known to the public insurance adjuster.

(6) The total compensation received for the adjustment.

(7) An itemized statement of disbursements made by the public insurance adjuster from recoveries received on behalf of the insured.

(b) Records shall be maintained for at least five years after the termination of the transaction with the insured, and shall be open to examination by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15028.6.

All funds received as claim proceeds by any person acting as a public insurance adjuster are received and held by that person in his or her fiduciary capacity. Any person who diverts or appropriates any fiduciary funds for his or her own use is guilty of theft and punishable for theft as provided by law. Every applicant for a license to act as a public insurance adjuster shall, as part of the application, endorse an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of all financial records of any fiduciary funds as defined in this section, pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code. The authorization shall continue in force and effect for so long as the licensee continues to be licensed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15028.7.

(a) A public adjuster who receives, accepts, or holds any funds on behalf of an insured towards the settlement of a claim for loss or damage shall deposit the funds in a non-interest-bearing escrow or trust account in a financial institution that is insured by an agency of the federal government in the adjuster’s home state or the state where the loss occurred.

(b) All funds held in an escrow or trust account shall be the property of the insured and shall be held pursuant to a written contract signed by the insured and the public adjuster.

(c) A public adjuster who receives any fiduciary funds shall, within 15 business days of receipt, deposit the funds in the escrow account and provide a written statement to the insured showing the amount of funds received and deposited in escrow.

(d) A public adjuster who, after reasonable diligence, is unable to obtain the endorsements of all payees designated on any bank draft representing fiduciary funds, or who receives a written statement from the insured indicating that he or she does not wish to establish an escrow or trust account, shall be exempt from the requirements of subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.

(e) The endorsement by a payee designated on any bank draft representing fiduciary funds shall not be construed as a waiver of any potential right of the payee to dispute the public adjuster’s entitlement to those funds or any portion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

15029.

No person shall concurrently hold a license under the provisions of this chapter and the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15030.

Each licensee shall maintain a record containing that information relative to his or her employees as may be prescribed by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15031.

(a) A licensee shall not conduct a business under a fictitious or other business name unless and until he or she has obtained the written authorization of the commissioner to do so.

(b) The commissioner shall not authorize the use of a fictitious or other business name that is so similar to that of a public officer or agency or that is used by another licensee that the public may be confused or misled thereby.

(c) The authorization shall require, as a condition precedent to the use of a fictitious name, that the licensee comply with Section 1724.5.

(d) A licensee desiring to conduct his or her
 business under more than one fictitious name shall obtain the authorization of the commissioner in a manner prescribed in this section for the use of additional fictitious names.

(e) The licensee shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each authorization to use an additional fictitious name and for each change in the use of a fictitious business name. If the original license is issued in a nonfictitious name and authorization is requested to have the license reissued in a fictitious business name, the licensee shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for that authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 18.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15032.

Every advertisement by a licensee soliciting or advertising business shall contain his or her name, address, or license number as they appear in the records of the commissioner. The commissioner may adopt regulations defining the term “advertisement” as used in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bonds [15033. - 15037.]

15033.

No license shall be issued under this chapter unless the applicant files with the commissioner a surety bond executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the state in the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) conditioned for the faithful and honest conduct of business by the applicant. The bond, as to its form, execution, and sufficiency of the surety shall be approved by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

15034.

The bond required by this chapter shall be taken in the name of the people in the state and every person injured by the willful, malicious, or wrongful act of the principal may bring an action on the bond in his or her name to recover damages suffered by reason of that willful, malicious, or wrongful act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15035.

Every licensee shall at all times maintain on file the surety bond required by this chapter in full force and effect and upon failure to do so the license of the licensee shall be forthwith suspended and shall not be reinstated until an application therefore, in the form prescribed by the commissioner, is filed together with a proper bond. The commissioner may deny the application notwithstanding the applicant’s compliance with this section:

(a) For any reason which would justify a refusal to issue, or a suspension or revocation of, a license.

(b) For the performance of applicant of any practice while under suspension for failure to keep his or her bond in force, for which a license under this chapter is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15036.

In lieu of the surety bond required by this chapter there may be deposited with the State of California the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in cash, or evidence of deposit of the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in banks authorized to do business in this state and insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or investment certificates or share accounts in the amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) issued by a savings association doing business in this state and insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or evidence of a certificate of funds or share account of the sum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in a credit union as defined in Section 14002 of the Financial Code whose share deposits are guaranteed by the National Credit Union Administration or guaranteed by any other agency approved by the Department
 of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 200.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15037.

Bonds executed and filed with the commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall remain in force and effect until the surety has terminated future liability by 30-day notice to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Disciplinary Proceedings [15038. - 15043.]

15038.

Except as otherwise required to comply with the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 15044), the proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15039.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if he or she determines that the licensee has done any of the following:

(a) Made any false statement or given any false information in connection with an application for a license or a renewal or reinstatement of the license.

(b) Violated this chapter.

(c) Violated any rule of the commissioner adopted pursuant to the authority contained in this chapter.

(d) Been convicted of any crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of the holder of the registration or license in question.

(e) Impersonated, or permitted, or aided and abetted an employee to impersonate a law enforcement officer or employee of the United States of America, or of any state or subdivision thereof.

(f) Committed or permitted any employee to commit any act, while the license was expired which would be cause for the suspension or revocation of a license, or grounds for the denial of an application for a license.

(g) Willfully failed or refused to render to a client services or a report as agreed between the parties and for which compensation has been paid or tendered in accordance with the agreement of the parties.

(h) Committed assault, battery, or kidnapping, or used force or violence on any person.

(i) Knowingly violated, or advised, encouraged, or assisted the violation of any court order or injunction in the course of business as a licensee.

(j) Acted as a runner or capper for any attorney.

(k) Committed any act which is a ground for denial of an application for license under this chapter.

(l) Manufactured evidence.

(m) Acceptance of employment adverse to a client or former client relating to a matter with respect to which the licensee has obtained confidential information by reason of or in the course of his or her employment by that client or former client.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 476.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

15039.5.

The commissioner may, without hearing, suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if he or she determines that the licensee has committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of license under Section 15018.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 448, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

15040.

The record or conviction, or a certified copy thereof, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction as that term is used in this article or in Section 15018 or 15018.5.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article or of Section 15018 or 15018.5. The commissioner may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing that person
 to withdraw their plea of guilty and enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 627, Sec. 24.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

15041.

The commissioner shall suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if the commissioner determines that the licensee has:

(a) Used any letterhead, advertisement, or other printed matter, or in any matter whatever represented that he or she is an instrumentality of the federal government, a state, or any political subdivision thereof.

(b) Used a name different than that under which he or she is currently licensed in an advertisement, solicitation, or contract for business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15042.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if the commissioner determines that the licensee has committed any act in the course of the licensee’s business constituting dishonesty or fraud.

“Dishonesty or fraud” as used in this section includes, in addition to other acts not specifically enumerated herein, any of the following:

(a) Knowingly making a false statement relating to evidence or information obtained in the course of employment, or knowingly publishing a slander or libel in the course of business.

(b) Using illegal means in the collection or attempted collection of a debt or obligation.

(c) Manufacture of evidence.

(d) Acceptance of employment adverse to a client or former client relating to a matter with respect to which the licensee has obtained confidential information by reason of or in the course of his or her employment by that client or former client.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15043.

The commissioner, in lieu of suspending or revoking a license issued under this chapter for violations of Sections 15039, 15041, and 15042, may impose a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) upon a licensee, if the commissioner determines that such action better serves the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Nonresidents [15044. - 15052.]

15044.

As used in this article, “presiding officer” means the Executive Officer of the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15045.

The acceptance of a nonresident licensee of any of the rights and privileges conferred upon him or her by this chapter, as evidenced by his or her performance in this state, either personally or through an employee, of any act for which a licensee is required by this chapter, is equivalent to the appointment by that licensee of the presiding officer as his or her true and lawful attorney upon who may be served all lawful process and any disciplinary proceedings conducted upon him or her under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15046.

The acceptance of such rights and privileges as evidenced by such act shall signify the agreement of the licensee that any such process which is served against him or her in the manner provided in this article shall be of the same legal force and validity as if serviced upon him or her personally in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15047.

Service shall be made by leaving a copy of the accusation, together with notice of defense and statement to respondent as described in Section 11505 of the Government Code, with a fee of five dollars ($5) for each licensee to be served, in the hands of the presiding officer or in his or her office in Sacramento. That service shall be sufficient service on the licensees subject to compliance with Section 15048.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15048.

A notice of that service and a copy of the accusation, together with the notice of defense and statement to respondent shall forthwith be sent by registered mail by the presiding officer to the licensee at his or her last known address as furnished by the commissioner. Personal service of the notice, copy of the accusation, notice of defense, and statement to respondent upon the licensee whenever found outside this state shall be the equivalent to those mailings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15049.

Proof of compliance with Section 15048 shall be made in the event of service by mail by affidavit of the presiding officer or his or her authorized employee showing such service by mailing, together with the return receipt of the United States Post Office bearing the signature of the licensee or his or her agent. That affidavit or receipt shall be appended to the original accusation on file with the commissioner. In the event of personal service outside this state, such compliance may be proven by the return of any duly constituted public officer qualified to serve process in civil actions in the state or jurisdiction where the licensee is found, showing such service to have been made. Such return shall be appended to the original accusation on file with the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15050.

The commissioner, or if the proceeding is heard before a hearing officer of the Office of Administrative Hearings, the hearing officer, may order those postponements or continuances and grant those extensions of time as may be necessary to afford the licensee reasonable opportunity to defend the proceedings. In no event shall the licensee have less than 30 days after the date of service of accusation in which to file a notice of defense, nor shall the notice of hearings provided for in Section 11509 of the Government Code or the notice and copy of affidavit referred to in Section 11514 of the Government Code be mailed or delivered less than 20 days prior to the date of hearing, and the time for making a request to cross-examine under Section 11514 of the Government Code shall be not less than 15 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15051.

The presiding officer shall keep a record of all process served upon him or her pursuant to this article, which records shall show the day and hour of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15052.

As used in this article, “nonresident” means a person who is not a resident of this state at the time of the performance of the act referred to in Section 15045.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Penal Provisions [15053. - 15053.]

15053.

A person who knowingly falsifies the fingerprints or photographs submitted under subdivision (f) of Section 15010 or paragraph (12) of subdivision (b) of Section 15016 is guilty of a felony. A person who violates any of the other provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 20.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Expiration and Renewal of Licenses and Cards [15054. - 15062.]

15054.

Every license, branch office certificate, and pocket card issued pursuant to this chapter shall expire on the day two years after the last calendar day of the month in which the initial license was issued. Licenses issued prior to January 1, 2011, shall expire on May 31 of each even-numbered year. To renew an unexpired license or certificate, the licensee shall, on or before the date on which it would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the commissioner, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter. On renewal, the evidence of renewal of the license or certificate as the commissioner may prescribe, and renewal pocket cards for the persons mentioned in Section 15022 shall be issued to the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 31.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

15055.

Notwithstanding Section 15054, the commissioner may establish license periods and renewal dates for all licenses issued pursuant to this chapter so as to distribute the renewal work to permit the most efficient and economic use of personnel and equipment. In such cases, to the extent practical, provisions shall be made for the proration or other adjustment of fees so that no person shall be required to pay more than that which he or she would have been required to pay and no change in license period or renewal date shall be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1202, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

15056.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, an expired license or branch office certificate may be renewed at any time within one year after its expiration on the filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the commissioner, and the payment of a renewal fee in effect on the actual renewal date. If the license or certificate is renewed after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever occurs last. If so renewed, the license or certificate shall continue in effect through the
 date provided in Section 15054 that next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(b) Renewal of a license or certificate does not prohibit the bringing of disciplinary proceedings for an act committed before the effective date of the renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 833, Sec. 21.   (SB 488)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

15057.

A suspended license or branch office certificate is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but renewal of the license does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended, and renewal of the branch office certificate does not entitle the licensee, while the certificate remains suspended, and until it is reinstated, to engage in the license activity at the location for which the certificate was issued, or to engage in any other activity or conduct in violation with an order or judgment by which certificate was suspended.
